Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.070

Community property—Disposition—Probate administration of.

Except as provided in RCW 41.04.273 and 11.84.025, upon the death of a decedent, a one-half share of the community property shall be confirmed to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, and the other one-half share shall be subject to testamentary disposition by the decedent, or shall descend as provided in chapter 11.04 RCW. The whole of the community property shall be subject to probate administration for all purposes of this title, including the payment of obligations and debts of the community, the award in lieu of homestead, the allowance for family support, and any other matter for which the community property would be responsible or liable if the decedent were living.

[ 2008 c 6 s 902; 1998 c 292 s 504; 1967 c 168 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—Conflict with federal requirements—1998 c 292: See notes following RCW 41.04.273.

Effective dates—1998 c 292: See RCW 11.11.903.

Effective date—1967 c 168: "The provisions of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1967." [1967 c 168 ss 16, 19.]

Descent and distribution of community property: RCW 11.04.015(1).

Disposition of quasi-community property: RCW 26.16.230.